tests/runtime/among.sbl
// Test among.

externals (stem)

routines (gate bgate)

stringescapes {}

define gate as 'q'

backwardmode (
  define bgate as 'q'
)

define stem as (
  not (
    among (
      'x' ()
      '' gate ()
    )
    ='gated default among case did not fail as expected'
  )
  not (
    backwards among (
      'a' bgate
      'bc' bgate
    )
    ='gated among did not fail as expected'
  )
  test (
    ='jalovc'
    backwards (
      [substring] among (
        // -c -> -k
        'c'
          (<- 'k')
        'nc'
        'avc'
        'ovc'
          ()
        'xnc'
          (<- 'xnk')
      )
    )
    ('jalovc' atlimit) or fail='empty among action mishandled'
  )
  ='ok'
)
